Illinois, session 104th, SB3947.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act is 5amended by changing Section 7.16 as follows: 6    (325 ILCS 5/7.16)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2057.16)7    Sec. 7.16. For any investigation or appeal initiated on or 8after, or pending on July 1, 1998, the following time frames 9shall apply. Within 60 days after the notification of the 10completion of the Child Protective Service Unit investigation, 11determined by the date of the notification sent by the 12Department, the perpetrator named in the notification may 13request the Department to amend the record or remove the 14record of the report from the register, except that the 60-day 15deadline for filing a request to amend the record or remove the 16record of the report from the State Central Register shall be 17tolled until after the conclusion of any criminal court action 18in the circuit court or after adjudication in any juvenile 19court action concerning the circumstances that give rise to an 20indicated report. Such request shall be in writing and 21directed to such person as the Department designates in the 22notification letter notifying the perpetrator of the indicated 23finding. The perpetrator shall have the right to a timely   SB3947- 2 -LRB104 19470 KTG 32918 b1hearing within the Department to determine whether the record 2of the report should be amended or removed on the grounds that 3it is inaccurate or it is being maintained in a manner 4inconsistent with this Act, except that there shall be no such 5right to a hearing on the ground of the report's inaccuracy if 6there has been a court finding of child abuse or neglect or a 7criminal finding of guilt as to the perpetrator. Expect as 8otherwise provided in this Section, such Such hearing shall be 9held within a reasonable time after the perpetrator's request 10and at a reasonable place and hour. The appropriate Child 11Protective Service Unit shall be given notice of the hearing. 12If the minor, who is the victim named in the report sought to 13be amended or removed from the State Central Register, is the 14subject of a pending action under Article V of the Juvenile 15Court Act of 1987 and is in the custody or guardianship of the 16Department or has an open intact family services case with the 17Department or is the subject of a pending action under Article 18II of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, and the report was made 19while a guardian ad litem was appointed for the minor under 20Section 5-610 or 2-17 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, then 21the minor shall, through the minor's attorney or guardian ad 22litem appointed under Section 5-610 or 2-17 of the Juvenile 23Court Act of 1987, have the right to participate and be heard 24in such hearing as defined under the Department's rules. The 25Department's obligation under this Section to provide a minor 26with a guardian ad litem appointed under Section 5-610 of the   SB3947- 3 -LRB104 19470 KTG 32918 b1Juvenile Court Act of 1987 and an open intact family services 2case with the right to participate and be heard applies only if 3the guardian ad litem notified the Department in writing of 4the representation. In such hearings, the burden of proving 5the accuracy and consistency of the record shall be on the 6Department and the appropriate Child Protective Service Unit. 7The hearing shall be conducted by the Director or the 8Director's designee, who is hereby authorized and empowered to 9order the amendment or removal of the record to make it 10accurate and consistent with this Act. The decision shall be 11made, in writing, at the close of the hearing, or within 60 12days thereof, and shall state the reasons upon which it is 13based. Decisions of the Department under this Section are 14administrative decisions subject to judicial review under the 15Administrative Review Law.16    For any expedited appeal initiated or pending on or after 17the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 18Assembly, the Director of the Department shall issue the final 19decision within 60 days after receipt of a timely sufficient 20request for an expedited appeal, unless extended by action of 21the appellant. Within the same 60 day time period, the 22Director shall receive and accept, reject, amend, or return to 23the Administrative Hearings Unit for further proceedings the 24Administrative Law Judge's recommendation with respect to the 25expedited appeal. The Director's decision is the final 26administrative decision of the Department.   SB3947- 4 -LRB104 19470 KTG 32918 b1    Should the Department grant the request of the perpetrator 2pursuant to this Section either on administrative review or 3after an administrative hearing to amend an indicated report 4to an unfounded report, the report shall be released and 5expunged in accordance with the standards set forth in Section 67.14 of this Act.7(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23.)